

RealScout, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 9:05 AM ET
Internet Software and Services

Company Overview of RealScout, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
RealScout, Inc. develops and operates a web and mobile platform that helps real estate agents collaborate with their clients. The company offers RealScout, a property listing alert and search platform that enables real estate agents and their clients to find the right home by aggregating and analyzing data points for every listing; and BrokerIQ that leverages listing alerts and collaborative home search platform to generate insights about a brokerage's buyers. Its listings include homes with natural lights, remodeled kitchens, high ceilings, large backyards, and other features. The company serves real estate professionals and brokerages in the United States. RealScout, Inc. was incorporated ...
RealScout, Inc. develops and operates a web and mobile platform that helps real estate agents collaborate with their clients. The company offers RealScout, a property listing alert and search platform that enables real estate agents and their clients to find the right home by aggregating and analyzing data points for every listing; and BrokerIQ that leverages listing alerts and collaborative home search platform to generate insights about a brokerage's buyers. Its listings include homes with natural lights, remodeled kitchens, high ceilings, large backyards, and other features. The company serves real estate professionals and brokerages in the United States. RealScout, Inc. was incorporated in 2012 and is based in Mountain View, California.
Detailed Description


480 Ellis StreetSuite 203Mountain View, CA 94043United StatesFounded in 2012



Phone: 650-397-6500

www.realscout.com







Key Executives for RealScout, Inc.




Mr. Andrew Flachner


      	Co-Founder and Chief Executive Officer
      








Mr. Michael Parikh


      	Co-Founder and Chief Technology Officer
      








Ms. Betty Kayton


      	Chief Financial Officer
      








Mr. Arthur Kaneko


      	Chief Operating Officer
      








Mr. Duke Fan


      	Head of Product
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

RealScout, Inc. Key Developments

RealScout Unveils RealScout BrokerIQ to Help Brokerages Complete More Deals, More Profitably
Feb 28 17
RealScout introduced an expanded solution that helps brokerages realize the full potential of their buyer data to drive more deals, more profitably. The new solution, RealScout BrokerIQ, leverages the company's listing alert and collaborative home search platform to generate insights about a brokerage's buyers, then uses this data to help brokers win more listings and close more in-house deals. RealScout BrokerIQ is now available to brokerages in major U.S. markets. By using RealScout BrokerIQ's proprietary technology and data, brokers can compile lists of buyer agents with clients that are interested in their active or future listings. This can be used for powerful listing presentations with real-time demand insights and proactive deal-making within their brokerage. Broker also provides one-of-a-kind analyses about a brokerage's buyer demand data, helping with difficult situations such as negotiating price reductions with home sellers. Brokerages that adopt BrokerIQ also continue to enjoy the benefits of RealScout's popular agent-branded, collaborative home search and listing alert platform.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 "Atlantic Tele-Satellite, Inc. United States .Club Domains LLC United States .Comdaq Corporation United States .Kache Media Management LLC United States @Court United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      January 13, 2017
			    
Hesta Home



Private Placement

			      September 20, 2016
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact RealScout, Inc., please visit www.realscout.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close












































Team – RealScout























































 
 








(650) 397-6500

GET STARTED
SIGN IN








MEET THE TEAM
RealScout is built for real estate professionals by real estate professionals.



Leadership




 

Andrew Flachner
Founder / CEO
Andrew is a serial entrepreneur with a background in real estate and early stage technology companies. Before RealScout, Andrew was CEO at the double dating website DuoDater and cofounder at Natural Cravings, a healthy vending company that was acquired in 2012.



 

Michael Parikh
Founder / CTO
Michael is a technical entrepreneur who is constantly looking for ways to make an impact. He oversees product development, engineering and user experience. Before founding RealScout, Michael served as founder and CTO at DuoDater, as well as CTO for Circa, a Tugboat Ventures funded App.



 

Duke Fan
Head of Product
Duke is passionate about building great products and teams. He comes to RealScout with 20+ years of product management experience from big and small companies. He was at Yahoo! almost 9 years where he lived and breathed personalization, and at realtor.com over 5 years where he championed mobile efforts. His three kids love Minecraft.



 

Arthur Kaneko
COO
Arthur is a ex-venture capitalist with a passion for startups. Before RealScout, he was Investment VP at DCM where he invested in startups in the U.S. and Japan. Before that, he was Product Manager at Togetherville, a kids technology startup acquired by Disney interactive.



 

Chris Conley
Director of Engineering
Chris brings a keen focus on building the right things at the right time to the RealScout engineering team. Prior to RealScout, he co-founded one of the first civic apps in the country, iSepta.org, was co-founder and CTO of an accelerator-backed startup, and led development at Monetate as an engineering director.



 

Pierre Calzadilla
Senior Director of Strategic Partnerships
Pierre comes to RealScout with 14+ years of experience in the real estate industry. He is passionate about developing relationships, building teams, and driving revenue. When he isn’t building a new business or playing with his 3 boys, he is managing his 501c3 non-profit, Poptism.org, an organization that helps fathers across various socio-economic levels become more inspired and responsible parents.



 

Bart Marchioni
Director of Member Success
Bart is a 20+ year veteran of both the high-tech and real estate industries and has experience ranging from startups to large enterprises; most recently in building real estate businesses. As Director of Member Success, he and his team help all our members grow their real estate practices using RealScout to engage, convert and close more business.



 

Betty Kayton
CFO
Betty has acted as interim CFO for many venture-backed startups including Dropbox and Cardpool. She helps RealScout with strategic planning, budgeting and operations. And she loves her teddy bears!



 

Helena Winkler
Head of Marketing
Helena is passionate about all aspects of marketing and having it drive value and business growth for customers and company alike. Before joining RealScout Helena held senior marketing roles at Epicor, Attensity, and OpenText. She views life professionally and personally as a great adventure.



Team



 

Andrea Gil
Member Success Coach
Andrea brings to RealScout years of marketing and event coordination experience. She’s here to make sure our members are able to amplify the value they provide their clients.



 

Anthony Sosso
Software Engineer
Anthony was born and raised in Pittsburgh, PA and remains a big Penguins fan. He found his love of well crafted software while in college at Virginia Tech, and has continued to make that a focus since moving to California. When not working, he’s reading The Food Lab, playing games, or at the gym.



 

Anna Marie Morales
Strategic Accounts
Anna Marie is a Bay Area native that is in love with all that Silicon Valley has to offer. She attributes her career success to her passion for building strong relationships and creating win/win scenarios for her clients. When she is not busy at work, you can find Anna Marie lost in a good book or practicing yoga. Her favorite authors are Jane Austen, George R.R. Martin and Agatha Christie.



 

Brian Sardo
Software Engineer
Brian brings a diverse engineering background and a passion for technology and startups. Prior to RealScout, Brian co-founded StriveZero, where he led web development, and worked at United Technologies building airframe components. He enjoys sports and traveling in his spare time and he loves a good laugh.



 

Bryan Kay
Product Manager
Bryan joins the Product team with insight into agent/client relationships and the home search experience from previously being on our Member Success team. As a native Californian, Bryan enjoys several outdoor activities especially kayaking, hiking and relaxing on the beach. He loves the challenge of solving complex problems and is thrilled to be working on a product that helps both agents and their clients win big!



 

Dane Dismuke
Member Success Coach
When he’s not playing video games or laying on the beach in Maui, you can find Dane providing support to our RealScout members. Dane is a Bay Area local with over a decade of customer service experience and is a huge Seattle Seahawks fan. Go Hawks!



 

Daniel Klein
Data Scientist
A Minnesota native, Daniel comes to the Bay Area from the East Coast, after years cocooned in Ph.D. work at Brown’s Division of Applied Mathematics. Joining RealScout by way of 8VC’s Catenus apprenticeship, he’s excited to get his hands dirty here. When he’s not turning data, alchemy-like, into wisdom, he enjoys distance running and playing instruments from the distinguished (cello) to the goofy (otamatone).



 

Davide Curletti
Software Engineer
Davide is a diehard Michigander who previously spent two years creating visual effects for Hollywood feature films. Since then, he has been honing his full-stack knowledge to create attractive and performant apps. He ravenously consumes films and TV shows, but manages to balance that with early morning hoops and late evening volleyball leagues.



 

Gil Raphaelli
Software Engineer
Gil joins RealScout following years of developing and operating large scale infrastructure at Comcast, Flickr, and Monetate. He reports in from his adopted home town, sunny Philadelphia, PA where he enjoys food, biking and going down to the shore.



 

Julian Jamison
Member Success Coach
Julian is a cool & calm Tennessee native and a former collegiate athlete. He immediately fell in love with the Bay Area because of its diversity. Julian was a freelance WordPress developer prior to RealScout. In his free time, he loves to BBQ while watching sports with friends.



 

Luis Castro
Front End Developer
As a front-end developer and computer engineer, Luis works with RealScout to apply new techniques to the web and help combine code with design. A native of Venezuela, he has a specialized degree in rum-making, and spends his free time making new blends.



 

Meatball
Full Snack Developer
A retired hotdog eating champion, Meatball now resides at RealScout as their foremost full-snack developer. When he’s not jumping onto keyboards, you’ll find him playing with his frisbee, lounging in a beanbag, or trashcan surfing for food.



 

Megan Keefhaver
Office Manager
Megan was born and raised in the Bay Area and has gained her experience in administrative work and excellent customer service skills at Nordstrom. Ultimately, she shows her personality through creating a fun office environment and dedication to organization. Megan enjoys staying active and cheering on the San Francisco Giants.



 

Nic Cavigliano
Software Engineer
Nic comes to RealScout with years of experience building applications from concept to fruition. He has been responsible for a myriad of projects and challenges in high performance and highly visible web sites. He’s an avid fan of technology, sports, cooking and problem solving. When he’s not hacking, Nic can be found playing basketball or cooking.



 

Nick Blumenthal
Software Engineer
Nick is a full stack engineer with a passion for new technology and making cool stuff. When he isn’t coding for work and for fun, you can find him acquiring random skills, flying airplanes and cheering on his Louisville Cardinals.



 

Puja Parikh
Business Operations Analyst
Puja joins Sales Ops with over three years of consulting and analytics experience. With a passion for data analysis and an MBA to boot, Puja loves applying her skills to disrupt real estate’s status quo! When she isn’t crunching numbers, Puja is crafting, painting, and spending time with her 1 year old son.



 

Russell Smith
Strategic Accounts
Both Russell and his personality can be summed up in three words: larger-than-life. A former offensive lineman at the University of Oregon, Russell comes to RealScout from the rental side of the real estate technology industry. He spends his days at the office dancing ridiculously, playing with the dogs, and connecting real estate agents with the tools they need.



 

Ryan Doherty
Software Engineer
Ryan is a full stack developer who’s dabbled in operations engineering while previously working at Mozilla, Yahoo! and SmugMug. His most recent adventure was designing and building open source race car telemetry software and hardware. When he’s not at work you can find him working on his race car and at the track.



 

Sergio Lopez
Sales Support Coordinator
Sergio’s mantra is “Relationships build companies”. Between growing his beard and finding the next best coffee shop, Sergio enjoys spending time with his wife and experiencing the newness of life through the eyes of his son. He is passionate about how things are built and often takes rides on his long board to reflect on how to best improve upon processes to create greater efficiencies in his work.



 

Vedrana Kavalar
Marketing Manager
Originally from Slovenia, Vedrana followed her heart and moved to California six years ago. She brings 7+ years of experience in communications and marketing to RealScout and is passionate about applying her skills to make an impact. When she is not working she can be found in a yoga studio, hiking, volunteering with Code for SF, or exploring San Francisco’s hidden gems.






CAREERS


   

 
 
HOME
AGENTS
BROKERS

 
ABOUT
TEAM
CAREERS
CUSTOMERS
PRESS
BLOG


 
PRIVACY
TERMS
CONTACT

 
CALL US
(650) 397-6500
© 2017 RealScout
















Request a Live Demo











Request Virtual 1-on-1 Demo











Start 30-Day Free Trial


























Scroll to top







Blog Archives - RealScout Blog

























































 












































Home/
Blog




Blog Articles









 






4 insights that ‘wow’ potential homebuying clients


Although it certainly would be memorable, impressing your potential homebuying clients doesn’t have to include picking them up in a Bentley or giving them neighborhood tours via helicopter. Instead, you want your clients to think: “Wow, John was really being sincere when he advised us not to buy that expensive house because it needed more restoration than we…






 






4 Rules of Crafting Killer Buyer-Engagement Emails


Have you ever replied to a buyer email and never heard back? Was it a junk lead? Maybe. It’s more likely that you sent an ineffective email. Put simply, poorly crafted emails waste time and money, the exact opposite of what they’re supposed to do. Leveraging the many years of experience I gained from being a Realtor…






 






Offer Gen IN THE NEWS


Last month RealScout revealed the concept of Offer Gen, the idea that real estate agents can boost marketing ROI by focusing on converting existing leads into offer-generating clients instead of focusing countless resources on generating new leads. Offer Gen has shifted the conversation in residential real estate and has been the subject of multiple Inman articles, blog posts…






Page 1 of 1712345»10...Last »


 Recent Posts 

Inman 2017 San Francisco Highlights


An Agent’s Algorithm: Why Local Expertiseis Still the Killer “Feature”


The Keyes Company Boosts Consumer Engagement through Industry-Best Home Listing Search


Why 2017 is the Year of the Real Estate Broker


Why Brokers are Losing the Battle for Buyer Data


 











See a Live Demo

















 

























Blog

Product Announcements
Real Estate Industry
RealScout Antics
The Wishlist
Top 10 Realtors
RealScout Testimonials
Contributors


Events
See a Live Demo











RealScout Inc Jobs, Reviews & Salaries - Hired











































Company Directory

Real Estate

Real Scout Inc






RealScout Inc

RealScout’s goal is to provide better transparency between real estate agents, home sellers and home buyers to bring efficiency to the $1 trillion residential real estate marketplace.


480 Ellis Street, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA


Founded 2012
16-50 Employees
6-15 Engineers
Real Estate









About RealScout Inc






REALSCOUT
RealScout’s goal is to provide better transparency between real estate agents, home sellers and home buyers to bring efficiency to the $1 trillion residential real estate marketplace.
In San Francisco, 1 out of every 20 home buyers use RealScout with their agents find their perfect home. In all our regional markets, our agents closed $1.5 billion in sales using RealScout over the first 8 months of 2016, which is growing rapidly as we expand across the country.
THE TEAM
We strive to cultivate thought diversity with candor, empathy and respect. We welcome people of different backgrounds, abilities and perspectives - it’s one of our core values.
We oftentimes pair program, hold hack days every other Friday, and maintain 85% test coverage in order to maximize learning as well as enable us to act quickly on those learnings.
We're open source across the stack - Ruby on Rails, Python (Caffe, TensorFlow, Pandas, Celery, etc), ReactJS, ElasticSearch, PostgreSQL, Redis and take time to give back to our community.
(For the curious, check out our team page for a fun, short intro to everyone at RealScout.)
ABOUT YOU
You'll be successful at RealScout if you:

Enjoy giving back to the software engineering community via blogging, speaking, contributing to OS, volunteering, etc, etc.
Revel in both teaching and learning from others to continually grow and improve yourself and others around you
Appreciate differing technical, social and cultural perspectives
Value simplicity, certainty and stability in your software and tooling over new capabilities
Strive to work towards meaningful goals by acting on measurable results
Enjoy working in an environment where your efforts will make a big impact

NEXT STEPS
We usually start out with an initial 20 minute conversation to answer your questions about RealScout to see if it looks like there's a good fit.
Next, it's your choice whether you'd prefer a 2 hour take-home coding exercise based on our production code or to schedule a 1 hour pairing session with one of our engineers.
Lastly, you'll visit the office to pair program with 2-3 engineers and chat with our VP of Product, CEO, and/or COO. Our hope is that by the end of the visit, you have a good idea of who you'd be working with, how we work together and what challenges we work on day to day, as well as a full understanding of our product and business.



90s Themed Funky Friday!


RealScout Founders + #1 Realtor in US


Yummy Lunch - Daily!


Our Customers Love Us


Member Success Feeling Zen


Bi-Weekly Lunch & Learn


Summer BBQ. Yum!


Lending a helping hand at Second Harvest Food Bank


Find a job at companies like RealScout Inc

Get Hired



Tech Stack




Ruby




Python




ReactJS




PostgreSQL




ElasticSearch




Redis




Heroku




AWS





Perks




Monthly team events (social & community service)




Flexible hours




Paid maternity & paternity leave




Conference and training reimbursements




Lunch delivered everyday




Gym Membership




Uber/Lyft Allowance




Laundry Allowance




Masseuse





Benefits

Medical, Dental, & Vision Insurance
Retirement/401K Plan
Life & Disability Coverage
Catered lunch



Investors
DCM
Formation 8
Joe Lonsdale
Ken DeLeon  (the top realtor in the U.S. in 2012)



Links

realscout.com


AngelList


CrunchBase




Press
Salesforce + Zillow? RealScout Lands $1.1M From DCM, Formation 8 For More Personal, Collaborative Real Estate SearchRealScout aims to fire up agents’ role in online searchRealScout Raises $6 Million Series A For Better Real Estate Search Technology



Investors
DCM
Formation 8
Joe Lonsdale
Ken DeLeon  (the top realtor in the U.S. in 2012)



Links

realscout.com


AngelList


CrunchBase




Press
Salesforce + Zillow? RealScout Lands $1.1M From DCM, Formation 8 For More Personal, Collaborative Real Estate SearchRealScout aims to fire up agents’ role in online searchRealScout Raises $6 Million Series A For Better Real Estate Search Technology











RealScout Marketing | 1,200 Cookies, 1,100 Miles, and 6,000 Smiles




































































 


















































Home/

Blog /
1,200 Cookies, 1,100 Miles and 6,000 Smiles  How RealScout Does Marketing






 








						1,200 Cookies, 1,100 Miles and 6,000 Smiles  How RealScout Does Marketing					

 September 15, 2014

Since its beginnings, RealScout has focused on building an innovative and empowering home search experience that keeps the agent in control while giving buyers the search tools they’ve come to expect. So when it came time to develop relationships with new agents, we didn’t think in terms of how many people we could reach — we asked ourselves how many people we could truly delight.
That’s when the idea of delivering cookies, #RealScoutCookies, came to us. Instead of buying banner ads that no one would see or postcards that no one would read, we chose to spend our money creating a delightful experience for the people we care about most: the agents and brokers who sell real estate.
#RealScoutCookies was a way to bring our belief in creating delightful experiences to the real world. Delightful products, delightful marketing. The end result was a lot of smiles, some great time spent thanking our current customers and a fun way to meet potential RealScout customers.
The main thing we learned? Focusing on delight is always the right thing. Creating delight doesn’t have to be expensive and it’s always more effective than a postcard.
So the next time you’re strategizing a marketing initiative, remember to start with delight. You’ll create a campaign that gives everyone a whole lot to smile about. Learn more about #RealScoutCookies results in the infographic below.



The Process
Prior to our first #RealScoutCookies event on August 24th, we publicized the opportunity for agents to for free cookies. A press release, blog post and several Facebook promotions later, we had a long list of open houses to attend – we delivered 1,200 freshly baked cookies between the hours of 1:00pm and 4:00pm. In total, our team members drove more than 1,100 miles and met with over 100 agents, two-thirds of which were not currently RealScout members.
Not only did we have fun spreading the word about RealScout and meeting with agents and potential clients alike, we also had a great time bonding as a team with our families in tow. “We had so much fun delivering cookies. At every stop my kids and my dog PeeJay would get out, eat a cookie, and have fun with the agent we stopped to see,” said RealScout team member Shannon Bertucci.
Of course, not a cookie was left in sight. We saw 100+ mentions across social media platforms, including one of our favorite tweets from Bryan K. Babcock with Keller Williams Realty San Jose: “@RealScout, those cookies are so good they should be illegal!!!”

The Numbers & The Lessons
Now that we’re back at the office and have had the time to digest the event – and the cookies – we’ve got numbers and lessons to share with you.
The Numbers

In a nutshell… Our RealScout team members drove 1,100 miles to 71 open houses, met with 100 agents and potential clients, and delivered 1,200 cookies. 31 cities participated, and two-thirds of the participants were non-members.
Costs. Our team spent $900 for cookies, $385 for press release distribution, $95 for flyers, $92 for lunch, and $60 for Facebook press.
Cost per lead. All said and done, #RealScoutCookies drove our cost per lead down to $38. RealScout has already signed up a handful of new customers that stemmed from this event.

Lessons Learned

Branding is key. Make sure you have a clear branding strategy that speaks to your offerings. Some people thought that we were a cookie delivery company instead of a software company.
Know your goal and calculate the resources needed. We were short staffed to get to all of the open houses, with some cookies being delivered towards the end of the open house.
Be personal and have fun! Experiment to discover what works for your community and measure your findings to take steps forward in the future.

Sometimes you’ve just got to think outside the cookie jar. That’s what we do at RealScout. 
Are you an agent?



 


				Andrew Flachner			

2014-09-15












← PreviousRealScout CEO Andrew Flachner Featuredon Agent Caffeine with Kelly Mitchell 

Next →Announcing The RealScout Contributor Program! 




 


Written by Andrew Flachner
Andrew is Co-Founder and CEO of RealScout, a startup tackling residential real estate’s core problem: matching homebuyers and homes.

As CEO of RealScout, Andrew drives company vision, the recruiting of its world-class team and strong relationships with industry influencers. Andrew is consistently featured as one of the 100 Most Influential Real Estate Leaders by Inman News and was recently honored as Forbes 30 Under 30 and Silicon Valley Business Journal's Top 40 Under 40.


				View all articles by Andrew Flachner 




Related Articles






 


Inman 2017 San Francisco Highlights








 


An Agent’s Algorithm: Why Local Expertiseis Still the Killer “Feature”








 


The Keyes Company Boosts Consumer Engagement through Industry-Best Home Listing Search








 


Why 2017 is the Year of the Real Estate Broker








 


Why Brokers are Losing the Battle for Buyer Data










			Comments are closed.		




 Recent Posts 

Inman 2017 San Francisco Highlights


An Agent’s Algorithm: Why Local Expertiseis Still the Killer “Feature”


The Keyes Company Boosts Consumer Engagement through Industry-Best Home Listing Search


Why 2017 is the Year of the Real Estate Broker


Why Brokers are Losing the Battle for Buyer Data


 











See a Live Demo



















 

























Blog

Product Announcements
Real Estate Industry
RealScout Antics
The Wishlist
Top 10 Realtors
RealScout Testimonials
Contributors


Events
See a Live Demo
















Bryan Kay | RealScout, Inc | Email @realscout.com 











































LOGIN

7 DAY FREE TRIAL


























Bryan Kay

 RealScout, Inc  Product Manager


Updated On : 
                    Oct 20, 2016                            

export

















480 Ellis St.

Mountain View, CA 94043


Email format for @realscout.com

Direct Phone: Not Available 









Type:

                    Private                
Employees: 
50 - 99

Revenue:  
5 - 10 Million

Industry:  
                        Services->Real Estate                    
SIC Code:  
                         Unavailable 








 BIOGRAPHY

 
                    If you need @realscout.com email addresses for RealScout, Inc, you can find them on Lead411 as Bryan Kay's email might be available. Bryan Kay, the company's Product Manager, also has extensive contact information, including RealScout, Inc's facebook account, phone numbers, linkedin url, wiki, and biography. Mountain View, CA-based RealScout, Inc can be found on Lead411 under the Real estate industry.  Some possible email formats for Bryan Kay are BKay@realscout.com, Bryan.Kay@realscout.com, Bryan@realscout.com, and Bryan_Kay@realscout.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@realscout.com addresses.            


Similar People:
Bryan K - Operations
Their Freelance Graphic Designer is Bryan K. Their Lead411 profile is categorized under the Printing services industry. If you're checking for Hallmark Cards Inc email addresses, these are also available on Lead411 with the @hallmark.com email addresses and possibly Bryan K's email. Hallmark Cards Inc is based in Kansas City, MO. You can also get Bryan K's linkedin info, twitter data, phone numbers, wiki and biography on their Lead411 profile. Their contact information is filed under the Printing services category.  Some possible email formats for Bryan K are BK@hallmark.com, Bryan.K@hallmark.com, Bryan@hallmark.com, and Bryan_K@hallmark.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@hallmark.com addresses.
Bryan K - Executive
Hoveair (Maintenance Services) Limited's Contracts Manager is where Bryan K is employed. On the other hand, the organization's CEO is . They are based in London, ENG, and you can find their Lead411 profile filed under the Healthcare facilities/services industry. Bryan K's profile contains twitter, phone numbers, linkedin, wiki, and contact information, and you can also find other Hoveair (Maintenance Services) Limited email addresses on Lead411 with the @hoveair.com domain.  Some possible email formats for Bryan K are BK@hoveair.com, Bryan.K@hoveair.com, Bryan@hoveair.com, and Bryan_K@hoveair.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@hoveair.com addresses.
Bryan K. - Executive
Have you been looking for contact information, like phone numbers and emails, on Bryan K.?  Lead411 provides data on him which include twitter, linkedin url, wiki, and biography.  There is also The Team, Inc email addresses within the @theteaminc.com profile so Bryan K.'s email could be included.  Bryan K. is part of the The Team, Inc which has its main offices in Washington, DC.  Currently holds the post of Chairman.  You can find the company data on Lead411 under the Sales/marketing services industry.  Some possible email formats for Bryan K. are BK.@theteaminc.com, Bryan.K.@theteaminc.com, Bryan@theteaminc.com, and Bryan_K.@theteaminc.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@theteaminc.com addresses.



Similar Employees:
Pierre Calzadilla - Executive
Pierre Calzadilla is part of RealScout, Inc, an organization which has its main offices in Mountain View, CA.  Pierre serves as the Sr. Director, Strategic Partnerships at RealScout, Inc.  If you're searching for RealScout, Inc email addresses, you can also find those on their Lead411 profile with the domain @realscout.com along with Pierre Calzadilla's linkedin name, twitter tweets, wiki, phone numbers, and biography.RealScout, Inc's Lead411 profile is categorized under the Real estate industry.  Some possible email formats for Pierre Calzadilla are PCalzadilla@realscout.com, Pierre.Calzadilla@realscout.com, Pierre@realscout.com, and Pierre_Calzadilla@realscout.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@realscout.com addresses.
Andrew Flachner - Executive
Located in Mountain View, CA RealScout, Inc has Andrew Flachner serving as the organization's Co-Founder and CEO. Need Andrew Flachner's email, linkedin, phone numbers, facebook, wiki and biography? You can find essential contact information in RealScout, Inc Lead411 profile, along with their RealScout, Inc email addresses using the domain. Search for RealScout, Inc on Lead411 under the Real estate industry.  Some possible email formats for Andrew Flachner are AFlachner@realscout.com, Andrew.Flachner@realscout.com, Andrew@realscout.com, and Andrew_Flachner@realscout.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@realscout.com addresses.
Michael Parikh - Technology
If you need @realscout.com email addresses for RealScout, Inc, you can find them on Lead411 as Michael Parikh's email might be available. Michael Parikh, the company's Co-founder & CTO, also has extensive contact information, including RealScout, Inc's facebook account, phone numbers, linkedin url, wiki, and biography. Mountain View, CA-based RealScout, Inc can be found on Lead411 under the Real estate industry.  Some possible email formats for Michael Parikh are MParikh@realscout.com, Michael.Parikh@realscout.com, Michael@realscout.com, and Michael_Parikh@realscout.com. If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@realscout.com addresses.

People Directory > Bryan Kay























Win and Sell More Listings | RealScout
















 



          More Deals, More Profitably
        

          RealScout combines revolutionary buyer data driven listings tools and industry-best home search experiences to
          help you win and sell more listings
        

          For Brokers
        

          For Agents
        








×Close
Thank you for your request.

      We'll be reaching out to you shortly! For now, learn what our customers are saying about us!
    





×Close
Give us a call

For Sales and Support
(650) 397-6500


Free Trial





×Close








×Close








×Close
















RealScout - Personalized Home Search with More Data About Local Listings / RealScout









Terms of Use






          Overview
        

          Last Updated: December 1, 2014
        

          PLEASE READ THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF USE CAREFULLY AS THEY CONSTITUTE A BINDING LEGAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN YOU AND REALSCOUT.  BY ACCESSING OR USING OUR SERVICES IN ANY MANNER, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTOOD, AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS DESCRIBED HEREIN AND ALL TERMS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE.  IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO ALL OF THESE TERMS, DO NOT USE THIS WEB SITE.
        

          Welcome and thank you for your interest in RealScout, Inc. (“RealScout,” “we” or “us”). The following Terms of Use, and any additional terms and policies incorporated by reference herein (collectively, the “Terms”), govern your access and use of the website located at www.RealScout.com and all other web sites, mobile sites, applications, widgets, tools, and other services provided by us which a link to these Terms Policy is displayed (collectively the “Sites”), as well as the content, features and services available on or through the Sites (collectively, together with the Sites, the “Services”).  The terms “you” and “your” refer to the user using or visiting the Services.
        

          Use of the Services by real estate brokers and agents is also subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the RealScout Agent Membership Agreement (the “Agent Agreement”).  In the event of any conflict between these Terms and the Agent Agreement, the Agent Agreement will govern.
        

          ONLY USERS WHO ARE 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER ARE AUTHORIZED TO USE THE SERVICES.  BY ACCESSING OR USING THE SERVICES, YOU REPRESENT TO REALSCOUT THAT YOU ARE AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD AND CAN FORM LEGALLY BINDING CONTRACTS UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.  IF YOU DO NOT QUALIFY FOR THE SERVICES, PLEASE DO NOT ATTEMPT TO ACCESS OR USE THE SERVICES.
        


Use of the Services

License.  You are granted a limited, non-sublicensable license (“License”) to access and use the Services solely on the terms and conditions set forth in these Terms.  Such License is for your informational, noncommercial and personal use only (except as permitted in the Agent Agreement) and does not include (and you are prohibited from): (a) any resale or commercial use of the Services (except as permitted in the Agent Agreement); (b) the collection, reproduction and use of property listings, pictures or descriptions or other content and information obtained from the Services except in connection with your or your client’s consideration of the purchase or sale of particular properties; (c) the distribution, public performance or public display of any portion of the Services including, without limitation, the content and information obtained from the Services; (d) modifying or otherwise making any derivative uses of the Services; (e) use of any data mining, robots or similar data gathering or extraction methods; (f) any reverse engineering, decompiling, disassembling or hacking of any aspect of the Services or any part thereof, or attempting to do any of the foregoing, except and solely to the extent permitted by these Terms; (g) downloading (other than the page caching) of any portion of the Services or any information contained therein, except as expressly permitted by these Terms; or (h) any use of the Services other than for their intended purpose.  Any use of the Services other than as specifically authorized herein, without the prior written permission of RealScout, is strictly prohibited and will terminate the License granted herein.  Such unauthorized use may also violate applicable laws including without limitation copyright and trademark laws and applicable communications regulations and statutes.  Unless explicitly stated herein, nothing in these Terms will be construed as conferring any license to intellectual property rights, whether by estoppel, implication or otherwise.  This license is revocable at any time.
Third-Party Content.  Most of the content and information on or available through the Services is either obtained through publicly available government sources or through multiple listing services or was otherwise posted, transmitted, distributed or made available by third parties, including other users.  Any opinions, advice, offers, listings, text, photographs, video, messages, descriptions, or other information or content provided, expressed or made available by, or originating from, third parties (including brokers, agents and their clients), including any content or information accessed through links from the Services (collectively the “Third-Party Content”), is solely the responsibility and liability of such third party and not RealScout. You acknowledge that such Third-Party Content represents the opinions and judgments of the respective information providers or users, and RealScout does not approve, endorse, control, or adopt any Third Party Content and makes no representation or warranties of any kind regarding such Third Party Content, including without limitation regarding its accuracy, completeness, reliability, timeliness, or legality.  You acknowledge and agree that RealScout is not responsible or liable in any manner for any Third Party Content, or any errors that may be contained therein, and undertakes no responsibility to update or review any Third Party Content.  Any use or reliance on any content or materials posted via the Services or obtained by you through the Services is at your own risk. Issues of data accuracy may be brought to the attention of RealScout by sending feedback but it is likely that such information accuracy cannot be corrected by RealScout and the entity or person that generated the information must be appealed to. For example: incorrect listing information can only be changed by the third party listing agent under our terms with the various multiple listing services (each an “MLS”) that we use.
Third Party Products and Services.  You may have been referred to RealScout through a third-party, or RealScout may introduce or refer you to third parties through the Services, such as real estate agents or brokers.  In addition, RealScout may host profiles for agents or otherwise provide information about or links to third-party products or services in connection with the Services.  Any referrals made or information or links provided by RealScout are for your convenience only.  Regardless of whether the RealScout name or logo appears in connection therewith, RealScout does not endorse, recommend, or make any representations or warranties of any kind regarding any third parties or third party products, services, providers, promotions or vendors, including real estate agents or brokers, you connect with or learn about through the Services or that are listed on or linked to from the Services (collectively the “Third-Party Products and Services”).  Your business dealings or interactions with such third parties, and any terms, conditions, warranties or representations associated with such dealings or regarding any Third-Party Product and Services, are solely between you and such third party.  RealScout is not responsible or liable in any manner for any Third-Party Products and Services, for any loss or damage of any sort incurred as the result thereof, or for your dealings or interactions with any third parties.  Nor is RealScout responsible or liable for any viruses or other damage you might incur when using or linking to Third Party Products and Services.
Hyperlinks. RealScout makes no claim or representation regarding, and accepts no responsibility for, the quality, content, nature or reliability of third-party Web sites, mobile sites or applications accessible through the Services, or linking to the Services.  Such sites are not under the control of RealScout, and RealScout is not responsible for the contents of any such site or app or any link contained therein.  RealScout provides these links to you only as a convenience, and the inclusion of any link does not imply affiliation, endorsement or adoption by RealScout of any site or any information contained therein.  When you click on a third-party link, you leave the Services, and you should be aware that our terms and policies no longer govern.  You should review the applicable terms and policies, including privacy and data gathering practices, of any site or app to which you navigate from the Services.
Equal Housing Opportunity.  All real estate advertised herein is subject to the Federal Fair Housing Act, which makes it illegal to advertise "any preference, limitation, or discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, or intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination." All persons are hereby informed that all dwellings advertised are available on an equal opportunity basis.  The U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (“HUD”) has published guidelines for those who advertise homes for sale. You can report housing discrimination to HUD in a number of ways, including via phone at 1-800-669-7777 or via web form. HUD provides a number of resources for consumers and professionals relating to fair housing. This is a good place to start: http://portal.hud.gov/hudportal/HUD?src=/program_offices/fair_housing_equal_opp/FHLaws/yourrights.  State governments and many local governments have similar laws prohibiting discrimination in housing. This excellent resource can help you find local fair housing enforcement agencies around the country: http://www.fairhousing.com/index.cfm?method=agency.search.



Registration

Log In Credentials. In order to use certain features of the Services, you may have to register for an account on the Services. When registering, you may be required to provide RealScout with certain personal information, which may include your name, mailing address, and email address. See RealScout’s Privacy Policy for information on how this information will be used. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your log-in credentials in order to use the Services, and are fully responsible for all activities that occur through the use of your credentials. You agree to notify RealScout immediately of any unauthorized use of your log-in credentials or any other breach of security with respect to your account. RealScout will not be liable for any loss or damage arising from unauthorized use of your credentials prior to you notifying RealScout of such unauthorized use or loss of your credentials.
Accuracy of Your Information. You agree to provide true, accurate, current, and complete information about yourself to RealScout. You also agree to update the information about yourself promptly, and as necessary, to keep it current and accurate. If messages sent to an email address provided by you are returned as undeliverable, RealScout reserves the right to terminate your account immediately with or without notice to you and without any liability to you or any third party or any obligation to refund any amounts paid.
Registration and Account Restrictions. You agree not to: (i) create a false identity or impersonate another person or entity in any way; (ii) create an account for anyone other than yourself without permission; (iii) create more than one personal profile; (iv) create another account without RealScout’s express written permission, if RealScout previously disabled your account. You agree not to share your password, let anyone else access your account, transfer your account or do anything else that might jeopardize the security of your account.



General

Consideration. You understand and agree that these Terms are entered into in consideration of your use of the Services and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged.
Changes to these Terms. To the full extent permitted by applicable law, RealScout reserves the right to change or modify any of the terms and conditions contained in these Terms or any policy or guideline applicable to the Services, at any time and in its sole discretion by providing notice in accordance with this paragraph that the Terms have been modified.  Such notice may be provided by sending an email, by posting a notice on the Site, by posting the revised Terms and revising the date at the top of these Terms or by such other form of notice as determined by RealScout.  Your continued use of the Services following the posting of the revised Terms or other notice of such changes will constitute your acceptance of such changes or modifications.  Otherwise, any changes or modification will be effective within thirty (30) days of the posting of the revisions on the Services unless you notify RealScout within such thirty (30) day period that you do not agree to the changes and you stop using the Services.  Therefore, you should review these Terms of Use frequently to make sure that you understand the terms and conditions that will apply to your use of the Services. Notwithstanding the preceding sentences of this Section, no revisions to these Terms will apply to any dispute between you and RealScout that arose prior to the date of such revision.
Evolving Nature of the Services. The Services are subject to change at any time. RealScout reserves the right, at its sole discretion, to terminate, suspend, make changes to or modify the Services and its features and functionality, without notice. We continually strive to improve the Services but if you are at any time dissatisfied with the Services, then your sole remedy is to discontinue use of the Services. We do want to hear from our users so do not hesitate to send us an email at feedback@realscout.com to let us know what you think.
Additional Terms. The Services may occasionally require that you agree to additional terms in order to use the Services, including those relating to Third Party Products and Services. Any terms required by RealScout for use of any portion of the Services offered by RealScout (but not those of any Third Party Products and Services) will, unless otherwise expressly stated in such terms, supersede these Terms in the event of a conflict only as to the content, functionality or features of the Services with respect to which those terms relate. Such additional terms (if any) (but not those of any Third Party Products and Services) are hereby incorporated into and made a part of these Terms by reference.



User Content and Conduct


User Content.
“User Content” means any content or material that users post, upload or transmit to or through the Services including, without limitation, text, photos, video, graphics, music, sound, messages, materials, data, information, comments, messages, or any other items . You are solely responsible for all User Content you create, post, upload or transmit to the Services, and you agree that such User Content will not (i) infringe or violate the rights of any third party, (ii) violate any applicable law, rule or regulation, (iii) be unlawful, libelous, defamatory, obscene, pornographic, vulgar, indecent, lewd, sexually explicit,  suggestive, violent, harassing, threatening, harmful, hateful, abusive, inflammatory, false, misleading, fraudulent or otherwise objectionable or (iv) contain any viruses, corrupted data or other harmful, disruptive or destructive files.
You agree, represent, and warrant that (i) any User Content you upload or transmit to the Services complies with these Terms and is truthful, accurate, not misleading, and offered in good faith, (ii) you have all rights, licenses, permissions, and authorizations necessary to upload or transmit the User Content to the Services and grant the rights to the User Content as set forth in these Terms, (iii) you will not upload or transmit any User Content to the Services where the rights have not been cleared for the Use (defined below) of such User Content on the Services, and (iv) the Use of such User Content in a manner consistent with these Terms will not infringe or violate the rights of any third party, including copyright, trademark, patent and other intellectual property rights or other protected rights, such as the rights of privacy or publicity. We have the right, but not the obligation, to monitor, review, access, and remove any or all of your User Content from the Services at our sole discretion.

License Grants. You retain ownership of any User Content you provide to the Services. If you post, upload, transmit or otherwise provide any User Content to or through the Services, you hereby grant RealScout a nonexclusive, unrestricted, perpetual, assignable, sublicensable, irrevocable, royalty-free, worldwide license to publish, reproduce, distribute, publicly display, market, promote, communicate to the public, make available, publicly perform, including on a through-to-the-audience basis, edit, adapt, translate, create derivative works from, and otherwise use and exploit (collectively, “Use”) such User Content, or any portion thereof, for any purpose and  in any manner, media and formats now known or hereafter developed, including through Third Party Services and applications. You further grant RealScout a royalty-free license to Use your name, image, voice, likeness, and any photographs or artwork made available by or on your behalf to the Services in conjunction with advertising, marketing, or promoting your User Content, RealScout and/or the Services.

User Conduct. You agree not to, and not to assist others to:
                
Upload or otherwise transmit to the Services any User Content that violates the User Content rules set forth in Section 4.a above or that contains a link to such material;
Attempt to, or harass, abuse, bully, intimidate or harm or advocate or incite harassment, abuse, bullying, intimidation or harm of another person or group, including RealScout employees;
Upload, post or otherwise transmit any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, junk mail, spam, chain letters, pyramid schemes or any other form of solicitation (commercial or otherwise);
Solicit, collect or attempt to solicit or collect personal information from other users of the Services, or disclose personal information about a third person on the Services or obtained from the Services without the consent of such person, except as permitted in accordance with the Agent Agreement;
Restrict, discourage or inhibit any person from using the Services,;
Use the Services, without RealScout’s express written consent, for communicating or facilitating any commercial advertisement or solicitation, except as permitted in accordance with the Agent Agreement;
Gain unauthorized access to the Services, to other users’ accounts, names or personally identifiable information, or to other computers or website connected or linked to the Services;
Post, transmit or otherwise make available any virus, worm, spyware or any other computer code, file or program that may or is intended to damage or hijack the operation of any hardware, software or telecommunications equipment, or any other aspect of the Services or communications equipment and computers connected to the Services;
Remove, disable, damage, circumvent or otherwise interfere with any security-related features of the Services, features that prevent or restrict the use or copying of any part of the Services or any content on the Services, or features that enforce limitations on the use of the Services or any content on the Services;
Use any scraper, spider, cheats, exploits, robots or other automated means of any kind to access, modify or interfere with the Services, or harvest or manipulate data, except and solely to the extent permitted by these Terms and the features of the Services, deep-link to any feature or content on the Services, bypass any robot exclusion headers or other measures we may use to prevent or restrict access to the Services;
Crawl, scrape or download any property or other data for inclusion in another real estate search service, content aggregator, or for any other purpose not expressly permitted by these Terms;
Interfere with or disrupt the Services, networks or servers connected to the Services or violate the regulations, policies or procedures of such networks or servers;
Post any content or material that promotes or endorses false or misleading information or illegal activities, or endorses or provides instructional information about illegal activities or other activities prohibited by these Terms; and
Engage in any activities in connection with the Services that violate any applicable law, rule or regulation.


Enforcement of Rules.  Enforcement of the user content and conduct rules set forth in these Terms is solely at RealScout’s discretion, and failure to enforce such rules in some instances does not constitute a waiver of our right to enforce such rules in other instances.  In addition, these rules do not create any private right of action on the part of any third party or any reasonable expectation that the Services will not contain any content or conduct that is prohibited by such rules. 



Intellectual Property Rights

Generally. The content made available on or through the Services, including without limitation, any text, software, graphics, designs, photos, sounds, music, videos and logos, may be protected by copyright or other intellectual property rights and owned by RealScout, third party licensors of RealScout or users of the Services. Except as explicitly permitted on the Services, no material made available on the Services may be copied, reproduced, republished, uploaded, posted, transmitted, or distributed in any way without written permission of the copyright owner. Modification of materials obtained from the Services, including, but not limited to, User Content, for any other purpose, including, without limitation, any commercial purpose, is a violation of the copyrights and other proprietary rights of RealScout or its licensors, unless you have obtained express written authorization to the contrary. All design rights, databases and compilations and other intellectual property rights, in each case whether registered or unregistered, and related goodwill are proprietary to RealScout or its licensors or users. 
Trademarks.  REALSCOUT, the RealScout logo and any other RealScout product or service name, logo or slogan contained or used in connection with the Services are trademarks or service marks of RealScout and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of RealScout.  You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "RealScout" or any other name, trademark or product or service name of RealScout without our prior written permission.  In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the service mark, trademark and/or trade dress of RealScout and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without our prior written permission.  All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners.  Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship or recommendation thereof by us. 
No Implied Rights. There are no implied licenses granted in these Terms. 
Feedback. You agree that RealScout shall acquire, and you hereby grant and otherwise transfer to RealScout, any and all right, title, and interest in and to any actual or suggested modifications, design changes, improvements, and other information regarding the features and performance of the Services you offer (“Feedback”) to RealScout, without the payment of additional consideration. 



Service Security
You are prohibited from violating, or attempting to violate, the security of the Services. Any such violations may result in criminal and/or civil penalties against you, as well as the termination of your privilege to use the Services, at RealScout’s sole discretion. RealScout reserves the right to investigate any alleged or suspected violations and, if a criminal violation is suspected, refer such suspected violation to the appropriate law enforcement agencies and cooperate fully with such investigations, including, but not limited to, the disclosure of any or all of your activities on or related to the Services.


Children
The Services are not intended for children under the age of 18.  By using the Services, you affirm that you are at least 18 years of age.  If you are under the age of 18, you are not authorized to use or access the Services.


MLS Terms, Disclosures and Disclaimers
Information about individual properties is provided by many listing sources, including one or more multiple listing services.  Listing information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed.  By using the Site, you agree to the following terms and conditions:

You acknowledge that the individual multiple listing service (MLS), which supplies the listing data, owns such data and you acknowledge the ownership and validity of that MLS’s copyright to such data;
Information provided through the Site may be used only for personal, non-commercial use and only use by a viewer with a bona fide interest in the purchase, sale or lease of real estate of the type being offered via the Site or other electronic means; and
The viewer will not copy, redistribute or retransmit any of the data or information provided. 

The “Days on RealScout” value is derived from the date the listing was first displayed on RealScout's Services, not from data in the MLS listing. The Site is offered by RealScout, Inc. located at 488 Ellis Street, Mountain View, CA 94043. You may contact us by sending correspondence to the foregoing address or by emailing us at feedback@realscout.com.
The following disclaimers apply to listings only from that particular data source:
BAREIS Copyright 2017, Bay Area Real Estate Information Services, Inc. All Rights Reserved.
BAYEAST © 2017 Bay East. All rights reserved. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. This information is provided from three separate sources: Bay East, CCAR and EBRD. Information being provided is for consumers’ personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. The listings presented here may or may not be listed by the Broker/Agent operating this website. Information update every 30 minutes.
BEAR The data relating to real estate for sale displayed on this Website comes in part from the Multiple Listing Service of the Bonita Springs-Estero Association of REALTORS®, Inc. Properties displayed on this Website include properties listed with brokerage firms other than the brokerage providing this Website. Detailed information about such properties includes the name of the brokerage firm with which the seller has listed the property. The properties displayed may not be all the properties listed with brokerage firms participating in the Bonita Springs-Estero Association of REALTORS® Multiple Listing Service, or contained in the database compilation of the Bonita Springs-Estero Association of REALTORS® Multiple Listing Service.
BMAR Copyright Bronx-Manhattan North Association of Realtors. All rights reserved. Information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed.
CAAR ©2017 Charlottesville Area Association of REALTORS®. All rights reserved. Information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed.
CCAR © 2017 CCAR. All rights reserved. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. This information is provided from three separate sources: Bay East, CCAR and EBRD. Information being provided is for consumers’ personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. The listings presented here may or may not be listed by the Broker/Agent operating this website. Information update every 30 minutes.
CLAW Based on information from CLAW and/or CARETS as of the data refresh time. The information being provided by CLAW and/or CARETS is for the visitor's personal, noncommercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties visitor may be interested in purchasing. The data contained herein is copyrighted by CARETS, CLAW, CRISNet MLS, i-Tech MLS, PSRMLS and/or VCRDS and is protected by all applicable copyright laws. Any dissemination of this information is in violation of copyright laws and is strictly prohibited. Any property information referenced on this website comes from the Internet Data Exchange (IDX) program of CLAW and/or CARETS. All data, including all measurements and calculations of area, is obtained from various sources and has not been, and will not be, verified by broker or MLS. All information should be independently reviewed and verified for accuracy. Properties may or may not be listed by the office/agent presenting the information.
CMLS The data relating to real estate for sale on this website comes in part from the GFC CMLS IDX Program. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than the real estate firm providing this website are marked with an 'IDX Logo' (a little black house surrounding the letters 'IDX') and detailed information about those listings includes the name of the listing broker. Information Deemed Reliable but not guaranteed. © 2017 Greater Fairfield County CMLS, Inc. All rights reserved.
CRMLS The information being provided by California Regional Multiple Listing Service, Inc. (“CRMLS”) is for your personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties you may be interested in purchasing. Any information relating to a property referenced on this web site comes from CRMLS. This web site may reference real estate listing(s) held by a brokerage firm other than the broker and/or agent who owns this website. The accuracy of all information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed and should be personally verified through personal inspection by and/or with the appropriate professionals. The data contained herein is copyrighted by CRMLS and is protected by all applicable copyright laws. Any dissemination of this information is in violation of copyright laws and is strictly prohibited. Information from sources other than the Listing Agent may have been included in the MLS data.
CVRMLS Information is provided for consumers' personal, non-commercial use, and may not be used for any purpose other than the identification of potential properties for purchase. All or a portion of the multiple Listing information is provided by the Central Virginia Regional Multiple Listing Service, LLC, from a copyrighted compilation of Listings. All CVRMLS information provided is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed accurate. The compilation of Listings and each individual Listing are Copyright 2017 Central Virginia Regional Multiple Listing Service, LLC. All rights reserved.
DBAAR The information is being provided by Daytona Multiple Listing Service. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. Information is provided for consumers' personal, non-commercial use, and may not be used for any purpose other than the identification of potential properties for purchase. Copyright 2017 Daytona Multiple Listing Service. All Rights Reserved.
EBRDI © 2017 EBRD. All rights reserved. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. This information is provided from three separate sources: Bay East, CCAR and EBRD. Information being provided is for consumers’ personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. The listings presented here may or may not be listed by the Broker/Agent operating this website. Information update every 30 minutes.
GRW Information provided by the Greenwich Multiple Listing Service, Inc. © 2017. Any information relating to a property, regardless of source, including but not limited to square footage, lot sizes, price, or status is deemed reliable but not guaranteed and should be personally verified through personal inspection and/or with the appropriate professionals.
GSMLS The data relating to real estate for sale on this website comes in part from the IDX Program of Garden State Multiple Listing Service, L.L.C. Real estate listings held by other brokerage firms are marked as IDX Listing. The dissemination of listings on this website does not constitute the consent required by N.J.A.C. 11:5.6.1 (n) for the advertisement of listings exclusively for sale by another broker. Any such consent must be obtained in writing from the listing broker. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. This information is being provided for Consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties Consumers may be interested in purchasing. © 2017 Garden State Multiple Listing Service, L.L.C. All rights reserved.
HCMLS The information is being provided by Hudson County MLS. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. Information is provided for consumers personal, non-commercial use, and may not be used for any purpose other than the identification of potential properties for purchase. Copyright 2017 Hudson County MLS. All Rights Reserved.
HGMLS Copyright 2017 Hudson Gateway Multiple Listing Service, Inc. All rights reserved. The data relating to real estate for sale or lease on this web site comes in part from HGMLS. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than the brokerage providing this website are marked with the HGMLS logo or an abbreviated logo and detailed information about them includes the name of the listing broker. The information appearing herein has not been verified by the Hudson Gateway Multiple Listing Service, Inc. or by the Westchester County Board of Realtors, Inc. or the Putnam County Association of Realtors, Inc. or by any individual(s) who may be affiliated with said entities, all of whom hereby collectively and severally disclaim any and all responsibility for the accuracy for the information appearing at this web site, at any time or from time to time. All such information should be independently verified by the recipient of such data. This data is not warranted for any purpose.
IRES Information source: Information and Real Estate Services, LLC. Provided for limited non-commercial use only under IRES Rules. © Copyright IRES. Listing information provided exclusively for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing.
IVBOR ©2017 Incline Village Board of REALTORS®. All rights reserved. Information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed.
MFRMLS The information being provided by MFRMLS is for the consumer's personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties the consumer may be interested in purchasing. Any information relating to real estate for sale referenced on this web site comes from the Internet Data Exchange (IDX) program of MFRMLS. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than this site owner are marked with the IDX/MLS logo. Information deemed reliable but is not guaranteed accurate by MFRMLS.
MHMLS The data relating to real estate for sale or rent on this web site comes from the IDX program of the Mid Hudson Multiple Listing Service, LLC. IDX information is provided exclusively for consumers' personal, non-commercial use, that it may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed and should be verified.
MLSLI The source of the displayed data is either the property owner or public record provided by non-governmental third parties. It is believed to be reliable but not guaranteed. This information is provided exclusively for consumers’ personal, non-commercial use. The data relating to real estate for sale on this web site comes in part from the Broker Reciprocity Program of the Multiple Listing Service of Long Island, Inc. Information Copyright 2017, Multiple Listing Service of Long Island, Inc. All Rights Reserved.
MLSLISTINGS © 2017 MLS Listings Inc. All rights reserved. The data relating to real estate for sale on this website comes in part from the Internet Data Exchange program of the MLS Listings Inc. MLS system. The broker providing this data believes the data to be correct, but advises interested parties to confirm all information before relying on it for a purchase decision. The information being provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. MLS Data hosted on RealScout.com
MLSPIN The property listing data and information set forth herein were provided to MLS Property Information Network, Inc. from third party sources, including sellers, lessors and public records, and were compiled by MLS Property Information Network, Inc. The property listing data and information are for the personal, non commercial use of consumers having a good faith interest in purchasing or leasing listed properties of the type displayed to them and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties which such consumers may have a good faith interest in purchasing or leasing. MLS Property Information Network, Inc. and its subscribers disclaim any and all representations and warranties as to the accuracy of the property listing data and information set forth herein.
MOMLS The information is being provided by Monmouth-Ocean MLS. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. Information is provided for consumers' personal, non-commercial use, and may not be used for any purpose other than the identification of potential properties for purchase. © 2017 Monmouth-Ocean MLS. All Rights Reserved.
NAPLESMLS The source of the information about real property available for sale or rent is the copyrighted and proprietary database of the M.L.S. of Naples, Inc. © 2017 M.L.S. of Naples, Inc.; all rights reserved.
NCRMLS Copyright © 2017 NCRMLS/Cape Fear Realtors MLS, Inc. All rights reserved. All information provided by the listing agent/broker is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed and should be independently verified. Information being provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing.
NNRMLS The information provided by Northern Nevada Regional MLS is for the consumer’s personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties the consumer may be interested in purchasing. Any information contained herein is derived from the licensed property of and copyrighted by NNRMLS. Information is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed. © 2017 Northern Nevada Regional MLS. All rights reserved.
NSBMLS Copyright 2017 New Smyrna Beach Board of REALTORS®.  All rights reserved.The data relating to real estate for sale/lease on this web site comes in part from the New Smyrna Beach Board of REALTORS® Multiple Listing Service (MLS) in which this real estate firm (Broker) participates. The properties displayed may not be all of the properties in the MLS's database, or all of the properties listed with the Brokers participating in the cooperative data exchange program. Properties listed by Brokers other than this Broker are marked with the MLS IDX logo. Information provided is thought to be reliable but is not guaranteed to be accurate; you are advised to verify facts that are important to you. No warranties, expressed or implied, are provided for the data herein or for their use or interpretation by the user. Federal law prohibits discrimination on the basis of race, color, sex, religion, handicap, familial status or national origin in the sale, rental or financing of housing.
NWMLS This 'Three Trees' icon indicates a listing provided courtesy of NWMLS. To submit a request for a takedown notice per the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (the 'DMCA') for any NWMLS listings please see this notice and follow the instructions provided.
RAGFL The multiple listing information is provided by  Ft. Lauderdale MLS. Copyright © 2017 Ft. Lauderdale MLS. All Rights Reserved. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed accurate. This information should be independently verified if any person intends to engage in a transaction in reliance upon it. The information provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. Some or all of the listings displayed may not belong to the firm whose web site is being visited.
RAMC The data relating to real estate for sale on this web site comes in part from a cooperative data exchange program of the Realtor Association of Martin County, Inc. MLS. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than Redfin are marked with the IDX logo (Broker Reciprocity) or name and detailed information about such listings includes the name of the listing brokers. Data provided is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed. Information is provided for consumers' personal, non-commercial use, and may not be used for any purpose other than the identification of potential properties for purchase. Copyright 2017 Realtor Association of Martin County, Inc. MLS. All Rights Reserved.
RECOLORADO The content relating to real estate for sale in this Web site comes in part from the Internet Data eXchange (“IDX”) program of METROLIST, INC., DBA RECOLORADO® Real estate listings held by brokers other than the brokerage providing this website are marked with the IDX Logo. This information is being provided for the consumers’ personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any other purpose. All information subject to change and should be independently verified. This publication is designed to provide information with regard to the subject matter covered. It is displayed with the understanding that the publisher and authors are not engaged in rendering real estate, legal, accounting, tax, or other professional services and that the publisher and authors are not offering such advice in this publication. If real estate, legal, or other expert assistance is required, the services of a competent, professional person should be sought. The information contained in this publication is subject to change without notice. METROLIST, INC., DBA RECOLORADO MAKES NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND WITH REGARD TO THIS MATERIAL, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. METROLIST, INC., DBA RECOLORADO SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ERRORS CONTAINED HEREIN OR FOR ANY DAMAGES IN CONNECTION WITH THE FURNISHING, PERFORMANCE, OR USE OF THIS MATERIAL. All real estate advertised herein is subject to the Federal Fair Housing Act and the Colorado Fair Housing Act, which Acts make it illegal to make or publish any advertisement that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. METROLIST, INC., DBA RECOLORADO will not knowingly accept any advertising for real estate that is in violation of the law. All persons are hereby informed that all dwellings advertised are available on an equal opportunity basis. Copyright© 2017 METROLIST, INC., DBA RECOLORADO® – All Rights Reserved 6455 S. Yosemite St., Suite 500 Greenwood Village, CO 80111 USA ALL RIGHTS RESERVED WORLDWIDE. No part of this publication may be reproduced, adapted, translated, stored in a retrieval system or transmitted in any form or by any means, electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording, or otherwise, without the prior written permission of the publisher. The information contained herein including but not limited to all text, photographs, digital images, virtual tours, may be seeded and monitored for protection and tracking. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed.
RMLS The content relating to real estate for sale on this web site comes in part from the IDX program of the RMLS of Portland, Oregon. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than the brokerage providing this website are marked with the RMLS logo, and detailed information about these properties includes the names of the listing brokers. All information provided is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed and should be independently verified. Listing content is copyright © 2017 RMLS, Portland, Oregon.
SANCAPMLS ©2017 Sanibel & Captiva Islands Association of REALTORS®. All rights reserved.
SANDICOR This information is deemed reliable but not guaranteed. You should rely on this information only to decide whether or not to further investigate a particular property. BEFORE MAKING ANY OTHER DECISION, YOU SHOULD PERSONALLY INVESTIGATE THE FACTS (e.g. square footage and lot size) with the assistance of an appropriate professional. You may use this information only to identify properties you may be interested in investigating further. All uses except for personal, non-commercial use in accordance with the foregoing purpose are prohibited. Redistribution or copying of this information, any photographs or video tours is strictly prohibited. This information is derived from the Internet Data Exchange (IDX) service provided by Sandicor®. Displayed property listings may be held by a brokerage firm other than the broker and/or agent responsible for this display. The information and any photographs and video tours and the compilation from which they are derived is protected by copyright. Compilation © 2017 Sandicor®, Inc.
SCMLS Copyright © 2017 Sullivan County Board of Realtors. All rights reserved. All information provided by the listing agent/broker is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed and should be independently verified. Information being provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing.
SFAR All data subject to ERRORS, OMISSIONS, or REVISIONS and is NOT WARRANTED. - Copyright: 2017 by San Francisco Assoc of REALTORS® Equal Opportunity Housing * All information deemed reliable, but not guaranteed.
SMARTMLS ©2017 SMARTMLS. All rights reserved.
STAR © Copyright South Tahoe Association of Realtors. All rights reserved.
SWFLGC The data relating to real estate for sale on this website comes in part from the Florida Gulf Coast MLS. The information being provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. ©2017 Florida Gulf Coast Multiple Listing Service, Inc. All rights reserved.
TRIANGLE © 2017 Triangle MLS, Inc. of North Carolina. All rights reserved. The data relating to real estate for sale on this web site comes in part from the Internet Data Exchange™ Program of the Triangle MLS, Inc. of Cary. Real estate listings held by brokerage firms other than the brokerage providing this website are marked with the Internet Data Exchange logo or the Internet Data Exchange™ thumbnail logo (the TMLS logo) and detailed information about them includes the name of the listing firms. Listings marked with an icon are provided courtesy of the Triangle MLS, Inc. of North Carolina, Internet Data Exchange Database. Listing firm has attempted to offer accurate data, but the Information is Not Guaranteed and buyers are advised to confirm all items.
TSMLS The information being provided is for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any other purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed. © Copyright Tahoe Sierra Multiple Listing Service. All rights reserved.
ULSTER The data on this website relating to real estate comes from the (IDX) of the Multiple Listing Service of Ulster County. Real estate listings of brokerage firms other than the brokerage providing this site are marked with the IDX logo and the detailed information about them includes the listing broker's name. This information is provided exclusively for consumers' personal, non-commercial use and may not be used for any purpose other than to identify prospective properties consumers may be interested in purchasing. All information provided is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed and should be independently verified. Copyright © 2017 by the Multiple Listing Service of Ulster County and Ulster County Board of Realtors. All rights reserved.


Indemnity
You agree to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless RealScout, its parent, subsidiaries, affiliates, investors, employees, consultants, licensors and sublicensees , and their respective shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives, contractors, licensors, suppliers and assigns, from and against all claims, suits, damages, injuries, liabilities, costs, fees and expenses (including, but not limited to, attorneys’ fees and court costs) arising from or in any way related to: (1) your use or misuse of the Services; (2) your User Content; (3) your breach or alleged breach of  any representations and warranties set forth in these terms; (4) your violation of these Terms; or (5) your conduct, including your violation of the rights of any other person or entity. Notwithstanding the foregoing, RealScout reserves the right, at your expense, to assume the exclusive defense and control of any matter for which you are required to indemnify RealScout if RealScout, in its reasonable discretion, concludes that you are not adequately protecting RealScout’s interests or are incapable of protecting RealScout’s interests, and you agree to cooperate with RealScout’s defense of these claims. You agree not to settle any indemnified matter without the prior written consent from RealScout. RealScout will use reasonable efforts to notify you of any such claim, action or proceeding promptly after becoming aware of it.


Disclaimers

THE SERVICES, THE USER CONTENT,  THE THIRD-PARTY CONTENT AND ANY THIRD-PARTY PRODUCTS AND SERVICES,  ARE PROVIDED AND MADE AVAILABLE ON AN “AS IS,” “AS AVAILABLE,” “WITH ALL FAULTS” BASIS WITHOUT REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, IN TERMS OF CORRECTNESS, ACCURACY, RELIABILITY OR OTHERWISE.  WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, COMPANY IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR TYPOGRAPHICAL OR OTHER ERRORS OR OMISSIONS IN LISTINGS INCLUDING RELATING TO PRICING, TEXT OR PHOTOGRAPHY.  
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE PURSUANT TO APPLICABLE LAW, REALSCOUT AND ITS AFFILIATES, OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, CONSULTANTS, LICENSORS, SUPPLIERS, AND SUBLICENSEES (COLLECTIVELY THE “REALSCOUT PARTIES”) HEREBY DISCLAIM ALL EXPRESS, IMPLIED AND STATUTORY WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT WITH RESPECT TO THE SERVICES, THE USER CONTENT, THE THIRD-PARTY CONTENT AND THE THIRD-PARTY PRODUCTS AND SERVICES. NO ADVICE OR INFORMATION, WHETHER ORAL OR WRITTEN, OBTAINED BY YOU THROUGH THE SERVICES OR FROM REALSCOUT, OR AN EMPLOYEE OR REPRESENTATIVE OF REALSCOUT, WILL CREATE ANY WARRANTY NOT EXPRESSLY STATED HEREIN. THE REALSCOUT PARTIES DO NOT WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES OR ANY PART THEREOF, OR ANY FEATURES OR CONTENT OFFERED ON THE SERVICES, WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED OR FREE OF ERRORS, VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS, AND THEY DO NOT WARRANT THAT ANY OF THE FOREGOING WILL BE CORRECTED. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT YOU USE, ACCESS, DOWNLOAD, OR OTHERWISE OBTAIN INFORMATION, MATERIALS, OR DATA THROUGH THE SERVICES OR ANY ASSOCIATED SERVICES OR APPLICATIONS AT YOUR OWN DISCRETION AND RISK AND THAT YOU WILL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY DAMAGE TO YOUR PROPERTY (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION YOUR COMPUTER SYSTEM USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE SERVICES) OR LOSS OF DATA THAT RESULTS FROM THE DOWNLOAD OR USE OF SUCH MATERIAL OR DATA. 



Limitation of Liability
IN NO EVENT WILL THE REALSCOUT PARTIES BE LIABLE TO ANY PARTY FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, SPECIAL OR OTHER CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH: (a) THE SERVICES AND THE USE, ACCESS OF OR INABILITY TO USE OR ACCESS THE SERVICES; (b) ANY THIRD PARTY PRODUCTS AND SERVICES OR OTHER PRODUCTS ADVERTISED, PROMOTED OR DISPLAYED ON THE SERVICES; (c) ANY INCENTIVES OFFERED BY THIRD PARTIES THROUGH THE SERVICES; AND (d) CONTENT (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION USER CONTENT AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT) MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SERVICES, IN EACH INSTANCE, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY LOST PROFITS, BUSINESS INTERRUPTION, OR OTHERWISE, WHETHER BASED IN TORT, CONTRACT OR OTHER LEGAL THEORY, EVEN IF ANY REALSCOUT PARTY IS EXPRESSLY ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE REALSCOUT PARTIES BE LIABLE IN THE AGGREGATE FOR ANY DAMAGES INCURRED BY YOU THAT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF FEES; IF ANY, YOU HAVE PAID REALSCOUT FOR THE SERVICES IN THE 180 DAYS PRIOR TO THE ACTION GIVING RISE TO THE LIABILITY. 


Limitations; Basis of Bargain
APPLICABLE LAW MAY NOT ALLOW THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY OR INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE ABOVE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. IN SUCH CASES, YOU AGREE THAT BECAUSE SUCH WARRANTY DISCLAIMERS AND LIMITATIONS OF LIABILITY REFLECT A REASONABLE AND FAIR ALLOCATION OF RISK BETWEEN YOU AND REALSCOUT, AND ARE FUNDAMENTAL ELEMENTS OF THE BASIS OF THE BARGAIN BETWEEN YOU AND REALSCOUT, THE REALSCOUT PARTIES’ LIABILITY WILL BE LIMITED TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT REALSCOUT WOULD NOT BE ABLE TO OFFER THE SERVICES TO YOU ON AN ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE BASIS WITHOUT THESE LIMITATIONS.


Term and Termination

Term. These Terms, as amended, will be effective commencing with your first use or registration on the Services and will remain in full force and effect throughout your use of the Services. 
Termination by RealScout. RealScout may terminate your account and your use of the Services or any of our features or content at any time and for any reason, or no reason with or without notice, including for conduct violating these Terms or upon RealScout’s sole determination. You hereby agree to RealScout’s broad right of termination. You agree that if your use of the Services is terminated pursuant to these Terms, you will not attempt to use the Services under any name, real or assumed, and further agree that if you violate this restriction after being terminated, you will indemnify and hold us harmless from any and all liability that we may incur therefor. Upon RealScout’s termination of your use of the Services, RealScout may, but shall not be required to, delete any of your User Content available on or through the Services, without any liability to you.
Termination by You. You are free to terminate your use of the Services at any time. You can simply choose to stop visiting or using any aspect of the Services. If you wish to terminate your account, you may do so by sending an e-mail to feedback@realscout.com mailto:privacy@RealScout.comor using any other account termination functionality that may be offered on or through the Services.



Privacy

              Please refer to RealScout’s Privacy Policy for information on how Real Scout collects, uses and discloses personally identifiable information from its users.
            


Jurisdictional Issues; Governing Law; Arbitration
The Site is controlled and operated by RealScout from its offices within the State of California. RealScout makes no representation that materials accessed on or through the Services are appropriate or available for use in other locations. Those who choose to access or use the Services from other locations, including from outside the United States of America, do so on their own initiative and are responsible for compliance with local laws, if and to the extent local laws are applicable. Access to the Site from jurisdictions where the contents or practices of the Services are illegal, unauthorized or penalized is strictly prohibited. This Agreement will be governed by the laws of the State of California, without reference to its conflict of law principles.


Arbitration

              PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPH CAREFULLY BECAUSE IT REQUIRES YOU TO ARBITRATE DISPUTES WITH REALSCOUT AND LIMITS THE MANNER IN WHICH YOU CAN SEEK RELIEF FROM REALSCOUT.
            

              You and RealScout agree to arbitrate any dispute arising from these Terms or your use of or inability to use the Services, except that you and RealScout are not required to arbitrate any dispute in which either party seeks equitable and other relief for the alleged unlawful use of copyrights, trademarks, trade names, logos, trade secrets, or patents (other than User Content). ARBITRATION PREVENTS YOU FROM SUING IN COURT OR FROM HAVING A JURY TRIAL. You and RealScout further agree: to attempt informal resolution prior to any demand for arbitration; that any arbitration will occur in San Francisco, California; that arbitration will be conducted confidentially by a single arbitrator in accordance with the rules of JAMS; and that the state or federal courts in Santa Clara county and California have exclusive jurisdiction over any appeals of an arbitration award and over any suit between the parties not subject to arbitration. Other than class procedures and remedies discussed below, the arbitrator has the authority to grant any remedy that would otherwise be available in court. Any dispute between the parties will be governed by this agreement and the laws of California and applicable United States law, without giving effect to any conflict of laws principles that may provide for the application of the law of another jurisdiction. Whether the dispute is heard in arbitration or in court, you and RealScout will not commence any class action, class arbitration or other representative action or proceeding arising from or relating to these Terms or your use of or inability to use the Services.
            


Miscellaneous

Waiver. A provision of these Terms may be waived only by a written instrument executed by the party entitled to the benefit of such provision. The failure of RealScout to exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. 
Severability. If any provision of these Terms shall be unlawful, void, or for any reason unenforceable, then that provision shall be deemed severable from these Terms and shall not affect the validity and enforceability of any remaining provisions. 
Assignment. These Terms, and any rights and obligations granted hereunder, may not be transferred or assigned by you without the prior written consent of RealScout, but may be assigned by RealScout without restriction. Any assignment attempted to be made by you in violation of these Terms shall be void. These Terms will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto, and permitted successors and assigns. 
No Agency. You agree that no joint venture, partnership, employment, or agency relationship exists between you and RealScout as a result of these Terms of Use of the Site. You further acknowledge that by submitting User Content, no confidential, fiduciary, contractually implied or other relationship is created between you and RealScout other than pursuant to these Terms. 
Survival. Sections 1.b, 1.c, 1.d, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, and 18 will survive any expiration or termination of these Terms.
Headings. The heading references herein are for convenience purposes only, do not constitute a part of these Terms, and shall not be deemed to limit or affect any of the provisions hereof. 
Disclosures. The Site is offered by RealScout, Inc. located at RealScout, Inc., 488 Ellis Street, Mountain View, CA  94043. You may contact us by sending correspondence to the foregoing address or by emailing us at feedback@realscout.com. If you are a California resident, you may have these Terms mailed to you electronically by sending a letter to the foregoing address with your electronic mail address and a request for these Terms.



NOTICE AND PROCEDURE FOR MAKING CLAIMS OF COPYRIGHT INFRINGEMENT

Repeat Infringer Policy. In accordance with the Digital Millennium Copyright Act ("DMCA") and other applicable law, RealScout has adopted a policy of terminating, in appropriate circumstances and at RealScout 's sole discretion, subscribers or account holders who are deemed to be repeat infringers.  RealScout may also at its sole discretion limit or disable access to the Services and/or terminate the accounts of any users who infringe any intellectual property rights of others, whether or not there is any repeat infringement.

Copyright Complaints. If you believe that anything on the Services infringes upon any copyright which you own or control you may file a notification of such infringement with our Designated Agent as set forth below.
                Name of Agent Designated to Receive Notification 
                of Claimed Infringement:  Andrew Flachner 
                Address of Designated Agent to Which Notification 
                Should be Sent:  488 Ellis St, Mountain View, CA  94043 
                Telephone Number of Designated Agent:  (650) 397-6500 
                E-Mail Address of Designated Agent: dmca@realscout.com
              




          Please see 17 U.S.C. §512(c)(3) for the requirements of a proper notification.  You should note that if you knowingly misrepresent in your notification that the material or activity is infringing, you will be liable for any damages, including costs and attorneys' fees, incurred by us or the alleged infringer as the result of our relying upon such misrepresentation in removing or disabling access to the material or activity claimed to be infringing.
        










RealScout - Personalized Home Search with More Data About Local Listings / RealScout









Privacy






Overview


          Last Updated: December 1, 2014
        

          This privacy policy (this “Policy”) describes the collection of personal information by RealScout, Inc., a
          Delaware corporation (“RealScout,” “we,” or “us”) from users of our Web site at www.RealScout.com (the
          “Site”), as well as all related mobile sites, applications, widgets, software, tools, and other services
          provided by us and on which a link to this Policy is displayed (collectively, together with the Site, our
          “Services”). This Policy also describes our use and disclosure of such information. By using our Services, you
          consent to the collection, use, and disclosure of personal information in accordance with this Policy.
        
COLLECTION OF INFORMATION
Collection of Directly-Provided Information

          We collect information you provide directly to or through us. For example, we collect information when you
          create or update an account or profile, sign up for our newsletter, participate in any interactive features of
          the Services, fill out a form, send us an email, participate in a contest or promotion, subscribe to our
          Services, apply for a job, communicate with us via third party social media sites, request customer support,
          provide information to other users of the Services, or otherwise communicate with us. The types of information
          we may collect include your name, email address, password, postal address, phone number, credit card
          information, agent or broker information, BRE or other license number, demographic information, information
          related to properties in which you are interested, and other contact or identifying information you choose to
          provide.
        
Passive Information Collection

          Log and Device Information: When you visit our Services, some information is collected automatically. For
          example, when you access our Services, we automatically collect your browser’s Internet Protocol (IP) address,
          your browser type, information about the device from which you are visiting the Services including the nature
          of the device (e.g., a personal computer or a mobile device), hardware model, operating system and version,
          and the identifier for any handheld or mobile device that you may be using), the site(s) that you visited
          immediately prior to accessing the Services, the actions you take on our Services (e.g. pages viewed and
          access time), and the content, features, and activities that you access and participate in on our Services. We
          also may collect information regarding your interaction with email messages, such as whether you opened,
          clicked on, or forwarded a message.
        

          Location Information: We may collect information about the location of your mobile device when you use our
          mobile application or otherwise consent to the collection of this information. This information may be used
          for various purposes related to the Services, such as to show you listings or agents in your area. For more
          details about the choices you have regarding location information, please see "Your Choices" below.
        

          Information We Collect Through Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies: We may collect information passively
          using technologies such as standard server logs, cookies, and clear GIFs (also known as “Web beacons”). We use
          passively-collected information to administer, operate, and improve the Site and our other Services and
          systems, to understand and improve the effectiveness of advertising on our Services, to see which areas and
          features of our Services are popular and otherwise understand site usage, to count visits, to determine
          whether an email has been opened and acted upon, and to provide advertisements and other content that is
          tailored to you. Most web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually choose
          to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies. Please note that if you choose to remove or reject
          cookies, this could affect the availability and functionality of our Services.
        

          Third Party Advertising, Cookies, and Analytics Services. We may allow third parties, including AdRoll, Google
          Analytics, Inspectlet, Localytics, Segmento.io, Qualaroo, Microsoft (Bing), Crittercism.com, DelightedApp,
          GoToWebinar, Intercom.io, Mailchimp, Olark.com, Optimizely.com, Klaviyo.com, Sendgrid, SpyFu.com,
          Unbounce.com, ZenDesk.com and Primeloop.com, to serve advertisements on our behalf across the Internet and to
          provide remarketing and other analytics services. These entities may use cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels
          and other technologies to collect information about your use of the Services and other websites, mobile sites
          and applications, including your IP address, web browser, pages viewed, time spent on pages, links clicked,
          conversion information and other information related to the Services. This information may be used by
          RealScout and third parties to, among other things, analyze and track data, determine the popularity of
          certain content, deliver advertising and content targeted to your interests on our Services and other websites
          and better understand your online and mobile activity. For more information about Internet-based ads, or to
          opt out of having your web browsing information used for behavioral advertising purposes, please visit
          www.aboutads.info/choices.
        

          Additional Disclosures Regarding Third-Party Advertising and Analytics Services:
        

          Google: We may use Google Analytics, including Remarketing with Google Analytics, Google Analytics for Display
          Advertisers or other remarketing tools, to advertise online. This enables third-party vendors, including
          Google, to show our ads on sites across the Internet. Google, may use first-party cookies (such as the Google
          Analytics cookie) and third-party cookies (such as the DoubleClick cookie) together to inform, optimize, and
          serve ads based on your past visits to our website. For information about how Google collects and processes
          data please see www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/. For further information about Google’s privacy
          practices with respect to analytics, including Google’s privacy policy and various privacy controls and opt
          outs, please see http://www.google.com/analytics/learn/privacy.html. For information on how you can opt out of
          Google's use of cookies for interest-based ads please visit Google's Ads Settings.
        

          Please note that opting out of personalized advertising through a specific analytics provider may be specific
          to the activities of such provider and may not affect the activities of other ad networks or analytics
          providers that you use.
        

          Information from Other Sources
        

          We may also obtain information from other sources and combine that with information we collect through our
          Services. For example, we may collect information about you from third parties, including but not limited to
          real estate agents, credit bureaus, mailing list providers and publicly available sources. In addition, if you
          create or log into your account through a social media site, we will have access to certain information from
          that site, such as your name, account information and friends lists, in accordance with the authorization
          procedures determined by such social media site.
        
USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION

          We may use information about you for various purposes, including to:
        

Provide, maintain and improve our Services;
Provide and deliver the information, products and services you request, process transactions and send you
            related information, including confirmations and invoices;
          
Send you technical notices, updates, security alerts and support and administrative messages;
Respond to your comments, questions and requests and provide customer service;
Communicate with you about products, services, offers, promotions, rewards, and events offered by
            RealScout and others, and provide news and information we think will be of interest to you;
          
Monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities in connection with our Services;
Personalize and improve the Services and provide advertisements, content or features that match user
            profiles or interests;
          
Process and deliver contest entries and rewards;
Link or combine with information we get from others to help understand your needs and provide you with
            better service; and
          
Carry out any other purpose for which the information was collected.

DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION

          We may share information about you as follows or as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy:
        

With real estate agents and other real estate service providers with whom your account is associated (e.g.
            who have invited you to join RealScout or with whom you have asked to be connected);
          
With vendors, consultants and other service providers who need access to such information to carry out
            work on our behalf;
          
In response to a request for information if we believe disclosure is in accordance with any applicable
            law, regulation or legal process, or as otherwise required by any applicable law, rule or regulation;
          
If we believe your actions are inconsistent with the spirit or language of our user agreements or
            policies, or to protect the rights, property and safety of RealScout or others;
          
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of RealScout assets, financing or
            acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company; and
          
With your consent or at your direction, including if we notify you through our Services that the
            information you provide will be shared in a particular manner and you provide such information.
          


          We may also share aggregated or anonymized information that does not directly identify you.
        

          The Services may offer social sharing features and other integrated tools (such as the Facebook "Like"
          button), which let you share actions you take on our Services with other media, and vice versa. The use of
          such features enables the sharing of information with your friends or the public, depending on the settings
          you establish with the entity that provides the social sharing feature. For more information about the purpose
          and scope of data collection and processing in connection with social sharing features, please visit the
          privacy policies of the entities that provide these features.
        
CHOICE

          If you receive commercial email from us, you may unsubscribe at any time by following the instructions
          contained within the email. You may also opt-out from receiving commercial email from us, and any other
          promotional communications that we may send to you from time to time (e.g., by postal mail) by sending your
          request to us by email at privacy@realscout.com or by writing to us at the address given at the end of this
          policy. Additionally, if we offer user account functionality on the Services, we may allow you to view and
          modify settings relating to the nature and frequency of promotional communications that you receive from us.
        

          Please be aware that if you opt-out of receiving commercial email from us, it may take up to ten business days
          for us to process your opt-out request, and you may receive commercial email from us during that period.
          Additionally, even after you opt-out from receiving commercial messages from us, you will continue to receive
          administrative messages from us regarding our Services.
        

          When you first launch any of our mobile applications that collect location information, you will be asked to
          consent to the application's collection of this information. If you initially consent to our collection of
          location information, you can subsequently stop the collection of this information at any time by changing the
          preferences on your mobile device. If you do so, certain features of our Services may no longer function.
        
ACCESS

          If we offer the ability to create user accounts or profiles on our Services, you may have the ability to
          access and update many categories of personal information that you provide to us by logging in to your account
          and accessing your account settings. If you wish to access or amend any other personal information we hold
          about you, you may contact us at privacy@realscout.com.
        

          If you request that we delete your account on any of our Services (via a user settings page, by email, or
          otherwise), we will do so within a reasonable period of time, but we may need to retain some of your
          information in order to satisfy our legal obligations, or where we reasonably believe that we have a
          legitimate reason to do so.
        
LINKS

          The Services may contain links to other Web sites, products, or services that we do not own or operate. If you
          choose to visit or use any Third-Party Sites or products or services available on or through such Third-Party
          Sites, please be aware that this Policy will not apply to your activities or any information you disclose
          while using those Third-Party Sites or any products or services available on or through such Third-Party
          Sites. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of these Third-Party Sites or any products or services
          on or through them. Additionally, please be aware that the Services may contain links to Web sites and
          services that we operate but that are governed by different privacy policies. We encourage you to carefully
          review the privacy policies applicable to any Web site or service you visit other than the Services before
          providing any Personal Information on them.
        
INTERNATIONAL VISITORS

          RealScout is based in the United States and our servers and data centers are primarily located in the United
          States. If you choose to use the Services from outside the U.S., then you should know that you are
          transferring your Personal Information outside of your region and into the U.S. for storage and processing. By
          providing your information to us through your use of the Services, you consent to the transfer, storage, and
          processing of such information in the U.S. and other countries. Also, we may transfer your data from the U.S.
          to other countries or regions in connection with storage and processing of data, fulfilling your requests, and
          operating the Services. You should know that each region can have its own privacy and data security laws, some
          of which may be less stringent as compared to those of your own region.
        
SECURITY

          We use reasonable security measures that are designed to protect personal information from accidental loss,
          disclosure, misuse, and destruction. Please be aware, however, that no data security measures can be
          guaranteed to be completely effective. Consequently, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any
          information that you provide to us. You transmit information to us at your own risk.
        
UPDATES TO THIS POLICY

          We may occasionally update this Policy. When we do, we will also revise the “last updated” date at the
          beginning of the Policy. Your continued use of our Services after such changes will be subject to the
          then-current policy. If we change this Policy in a manner that is materially less restrictive of our use or
          disclosure of your information, we will use reasonable efforts to notify you of the change (such as adding a
          statement to our homepage, sending you an email or such other method as we determine) and to obtain your
          consent prior to applying the change to any information that we collected from you prior to the date the
          change becomes effective. We encourage you to periodically review this Policy to stay informed about how we
          collect, use, and disclose personal information.
        
YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS

          California law permits residents of California to request certain details about how their information is
          shared with third parties for direct marketing purposes. If you are a California resident and would like to
          make such a request, please contact us at RealScout, Inc., 488 Ellis Street, Mountain View, CA 94043 or email
          us at privacy@realscout.com.
        

          CONTACTING US
        

          If you have any questions or comments about this Policy, please contact us using the following contact
          information:
        


          RealScout, Inc. 488 Ellis St.

Mountain View, CA 94043

support@realscout.com







